Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3302
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-3303 to 38-3318 apply.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1084;

Laws 2009, LB463, § 3;

Laws 2018, LB596, § 2.